New Jersey, session 222, S2616.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2022, c.49, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2023, there is appropriated from the General Fund the following amount for the purpose specified: 46 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH 20 Physical and Mental Health 21 Health Services 4285 Division of Community Health GRANTS-IN-AID 05-4285  Community Health Services .................................. $500,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, Health Services .................................................... $500,000 Grants-in-Aid: 05    Huntingtons Disease Grant Program..... ($500,000) The amount hereinabove appropriated for the Huntington Disease Grant Program, in addition to any other State or federal funds allocated for the following purposes, shall be allocated to support grants to institutions of higher education, non-profit organizations, or New Jersey based and operated research organizations for the provision of pre-symptomatic testing, neurology and psychiatry services, neurophysiological evaluations, treatment, disease management, and counseling for people living with or at risk for Huntington's Disease. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.